Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB638.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.220 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 161.220 to 161.716 and 161.990:
(1) "Retirement system" means the arrangement provided for in KRS 161.220 to
161.716 and 161.990 for payment of allowances to members;
(2) "Retirement allowance" means the amount annually payable during the course of
his or her natural life to a member who has been retired by reason of service;
(3) "Disability allowance" means the amount annually payable to a member retired by
reason of disability;
(4) "Member" means the commissioner of education, deputy commissioners, associate
commissioners, and all division directors in the State Department of Education,
employees participating in the system pursuant to KRS 196.167(3)(b)1., and any
full-time teacher or professional occupying a position requiring certification or
graduation from a four (4) year college or university, as a condition of employment,
and who is employed by public boards, institutions, or agencies as follows:
(a) Local boards of education and public charter schools if the public charter
school satisfies the criteria set by the Internal Revenue Service to participate
in a governmental retirement plan;
(b) Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State
University, Murray State University, Western Kentucky University, and any
community colleges established under the control of these universities;
(c) State-operated secondary area vocational education or area technology
centers, Kentucky School for the Blind, and Kentucky School for the Deaf;
(d) Other public education agencies as created by the General Assembly and
those members of the administrative staff of the Teachers' Retirement System
of the State of Kentucky whom the board of trustees may designate by
Page 1 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
administrative regulation;
(e) Regional cooperative organizations formed by local boards of education or
other public educational institutions listed in this subsection, for the purpose
of providing educational services to the participating organizations;
(f) All full-time members of the staffs of the Kentucky Association of School
Administrators, Kentucky Education Association, Kentucky Vocational
Association, Kentucky High School Athletic Association, Kentucky
Academic Association, and the Kentucky School Boards Association who
were members of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System or were
qualified for a position covered by the system at the time of employment by
the association in the event that the board of directors of the respective
association petitions to be included. The board of trustees of the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System may designate by resolution whether part-time
employees of the petitioning association are to be included. The state shall
make no contributions on account of these employees, either full-time or part-
time. The association shall make the employer's contributions, including any
contribution that is specified under KRS 161.550. The provisions of this
paragraph shall be applicable to persons in the employ of the associations on
or subsequent to July 1, 1972;
(g) Employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education who were employees
of the Department for Adult Education and Literacy and who were members
of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System at the time the department was
transferred to the council pursuant to Executive Order 2003-600;
(h) The Office of Career and Technical Education;
(i) The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation;
(j) The Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children;
(k) The Governor's Scholars Program;
Page 2 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
(l) Any person who is retired for service from the retirement system and is
reemployed by an employer identified in this subsection in a position that the
board of trustees deems to be a member, except that any person who becomes
a member on or after January 1, 2022, and subsequently draws a monthly
lifetime retirement allowance, shall upon reemployment after retirement not
earn a second retirement account;
(m) Employees of the former Cabinet for Workforce Development who are
transferred to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System and
who occupy positions covered by the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System
shall remain in the Teachers' Retirement System. New employees occupying
these positions, as well as newly created positions qualifying for Teachers'
Retirement System coverage that would have previously been included in the
former Cabinet for Workforce Development, shall be members of the
Teachers' Retirement System;
(n) Effective January 1, 1998, employees of state community colleges who are
transferred to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
continue to participate in federal old age, survivors, disability, and hospital
insurance, and a retirement plan other than the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System offered by Kentucky Community and Technical College System. New
employees occupying positions in the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System as referenced in KRS 164.5807(5) that would not have
previously been included in the former Cabinet for Workforce Development,
shall participate in federal old age, survivors, disability, and hospital
insurance and have a choice at the time of employment of participating in a
retirement plan provided by the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, including participation in the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System,
on the same basis as faculty of the state universities as provided in KRS
Page 3 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
161.540 and 161.620;
(o) Employees of the Office of General Counsel, the Office of Budget and
Administrative Services, and the Office of Quality and Human Resources
within the Office of the Secretary of the former Cabinet for Workforce
Development and the commissioners of the former Department for Adult
Education and Literacy and the former Department for Technical Education
who were contributing to the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System as of
July 15, 2000;
(p) Employees of the Kentucky Department of Education only who are graduates
of a four (4) year college or university, notwithstanding a substitution clause
within a job classification, and who are serving in a professional job
classification as defined by the department;
(q) The Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program;
(r) Employees of the Office of Adult Education within the Department of
Workforce Development in the Education and Labor Cabinet who were
employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education, Kentucky Adult
Education Program and who were members of the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System at the time the Program was transferred to the cabinet
pursuant to Executive Orders 2019-0026 and 2019-0027;[ and]
(s) Employees of the Education Professional Standards Board who were
members of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System at the time the
employees were transferred to the Kentucky Department of Education
pursuant to Executive Order 2020-590; and
(t) WeLeadCS, the virtual computer science career academy established in
KRS 158.809;
(5) "Present teacher" means any teacher who was a teacher on or before July 1, 1940,
and became a member of the retirement system created by 1938 (1st Extra. Sess.)
Page 4 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
Ky. Acts ch. 1, on the date of the inauguration of the system or within one (1) year
after that date, and any teacher who was a member of a local teacher retirement
system in the public elementary or secondary schools of the state on or before July
1, 1940, and continued to be a member of the system until he or she, with the
membership of the local retirement system, became a member of the state Teachers'
Retirement System or who becomes a member under the provisions of KRS
161.470(4);
(6) "New teacher" means any member not a present teacher;
(7) "Prior service" means the number of years during which the member was a teacher
in Kentucky prior to July 1, 1941, except that not more than thirty (30) years' prior
service shall be allowed or credited to any teacher;
(8) "Subsequent service" means the number of years during which the teacher is a
member of the Teachers' Retirement System after July 1, 1941;
(9) "Final average salary" means the average of the five (5) highest annual salaries
which the member has received for service in a covered position and on which the
member has made contributions, or on which the public board, institution, or
agency has picked-up member contributions pursuant to KRS 161.540(2), or the
average of the five (5) years of highest salaries as defined in KRS 61.680(2)(a),
which shall include picked-up member contributions. Additionally, the board of
trustees may approve a final average salary based upon the average of the three (3)
highest salaries for individuals who become members prior to January 1, 2022, who
are at least fifty-five (55) years of age and have a minimum of twenty-seven (27)
years of Kentucky service credit. However, if any of the five (5) or three (3) highest
annual salaries used to calculate the final average salary was paid within the three
(3) years immediately prior to the date of the member's retirement for individuals
who become members prior to January 1, 2022, or within the five (5) years
immediately prior to the date of the member's retirement for individuals who
Page 5 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
become members on or after January 1, 2022, the amount of salary to be included
for each of those three (3) years or five (5) years, as applicable, for the purpose of
calculating the final average salary shall be limited to the lesser of:
(a) The member's actual salary; or
(b) The member's annual salary that was used for retirement purposes during each
of the prior three (3) years or five (5) years, as applicable, plus a percentage
increase equal to the percentage increase received by all other members
employed by the public board, institution, or agency, or for members of
school districts, the highest percentage increase received by members on any
one (1) rank and step of the salary schedule of the school district. The increase
shall be computed on the salary that was used for retirement purposes. The
board of trustees may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to establish a methodology for measuring the
limitation so that the combined increases in salary for each of the last three (3)
full years of salary prior to retirement shall not exceed the total permissible
percentage increase received by other members of the employer for the same
three (3) year period.
For individuals who became members of the retirement system prior to July 1,
2021, this limitation shall not apply if the member receives an increase in salary in a
percentage exceeding that received by the other members, and this increase was
accompanied by a corresponding change in position or in length of employment.
The board of trustees may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to provide definitions for a corresponding change in
position or in length of employment. This limitation shall also not apply to the
payment to a member for accrued annual leave if the individual becomes a member
before July 1, 2008, or accrued sick leave which is authorized by statute and which
shall, for individuals subject to KRS 161.155(10) who became nonuniversity
Page 6 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
members of the system prior to January 1, 2022, be included as part of a retiring
member's annual compensation for the member's last year of active service;
(10) "Annual compensation" means the total salary received by a member as
compensation for all services performed in employment covered by the retirement
system during a fiscal year. Annual compensation shall not include payment for any
benefit or salary adjustments made by the public board, institution, or agency to the
member or on behalf of the member which is not available as a benefit or salary
adjustment to other members employed by that public board, institution, or agency.
Annual compensation shall not include the salary supplement received by a member
under KRS 157.197(2)(c), 158.6455, or 158.782 on or after July 1, 1996. Under no
circumstances shall annual compensation include compensation that is earned by a
member while on assignment to an organization or agency that is not a public
board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section. In the event that
federal law requires that a member continue membership in the retirement system
even though the member is on assignment to an organization or agency that is not a
public board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section, the
member's annual compensation for retirement purposes shall be deemed to be the
annual compensation, as limited by subsection (9) of this section, last earned by the
member while still employed solely by and providing services directly to a public
board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section. The board of
trustees shall determine if any benefit or salary adjustment qualifies as annual
compensation. For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008,
annual compensation shall not include lump-sum payments upon termination of
employment for accumulated annual or compensatory leave;
(11) "Age of member" means the age attained on the first day of the month immediately
following the birthdate of the member. This definition is limited to retirement
eligibility and does not apply to tenure of members;
Page 7 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
(12) "Employ," and derivatives thereof, means relationships under which an individual
provides services to an employer as an employee, as an independent contractor, as
an employee of a third party, or under any other arrangement as long as the services
provided to the employer are provided in a position that would otherwise be
covered by the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System and as long as the services
are being provided to a public board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4)
of this section;
(13) "Regular interest" means:
(a) For an individual who becomes a member prior to July 1, 2008, interest at
three percent (3%) per annum;[:]
(b) For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008, but prior to
January 1, 2022, interest at two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum for
purposes of crediting interest to the teacher savings account or any other
contributions made by the employee that are refundable to the employee upon
termination of employment; and
(c) For an individual who becomes a member on or after January 1, 2022, the
rolling five (5) year yield on a thirty (30) year United States Treasury bond as
of the end of May prior to the most recently completed fiscal year, except
that:
1. Once the member has at least sixty (60) months of service in the system
it shall mean interest at two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum for
purposes of crediting interest to employee contributions in the
foundational benefit component or any other contributions made by the
employee to the foundational benefit component that are refundable to
the employee upon termination of employment; and
2. The board shall have the authority to adjust the regular interest rate for
individuals who become members on or after January 1, 2022, in
Page 8 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
accordance with KRS 161.633 and 161.634;
(14) "Accumulated contributions" means the contributions of a member to the teachers'
savings fund, including picked-up member contributions as described in KRS
161.540(2), plus accrued regular interest;
(15) "Annuitant" means a person who receives a retirement allowance or a disability
allowance;
(16) "Local retirement system" means any teacher retirement or annuity system created
in any public school district in Kentucky in accordance with the laws of Kentucky;
(17) "Fiscal year" means the twelve (12) month period from July 1 to June 30. The
retirement plan year is concurrent with this fiscal year. A contract for a member
employed by a local board of education may not exceed two hundred sixty-one
(261) days in the fiscal year;
(18) "Public schools" means the schools and other institutions mentioned in subsection
(4) of this section;
(19) "Dependent" as used in KRS 161.520 and 161.525 means a person who was
receiving, at the time of death of the member, at least one-half (1/2) of the support
from the member for maintenance, including board, lodging, medical care, and
related costs;
(20) "Active contributing member" means a member currently making contributions to
the Teachers' Retirement System, who made contributions in the immediate[next]
preceding fiscal year, for whom picked-up member contributions are currently
being made, or for whom these contributions were made in the immediate[next]
preceding fiscal year;
(21) "Full-time" means employment in a position that requires services on a continuing
basis equal to at least seven-tenths (7/10) of normal full-time service on a fiscal
year basis;
(22) "Full actuarial cost," when used to determine the payment or payments that a
Page 9 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
member must pay for service credit means the actuarial value of all costs associated
with the enhancement of a member's benefits or eligibility for benefit
enhancements, including health insurance supplement payments made by the
retirement system. The board may promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to provide the methodology for the assessment
of and procedures for the payment and collection of the full actuarial cost of the
purchased service. The actuary for the retirement system shall determine the full
actuarial value costs and actuarial cost factor tables as provided in KRS 161.400;
(23) "Last annual compensation" means the annual compensation, as defined by
subsection (10) of this section and as limited by subsection (9) of this section,
earned by the member during the most recent period of contributing service, either
consecutive or nonconsecutive, that is sufficient to provide the member with one (1)
full year of service credit in the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and which
compensation is used in calculating the member's initial retirement allowance,
excluding bonuses, retirement incentives, payments for accumulated sick leave,
annual, personal, and compensatory leave, and any other lump-sum payment. For
an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008, payments for annual
or compensatory leave shall not be included in determining the member's last
annual compensation;
(24) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (4) of this section, or an
annuitant, as defined by subsection (15) of this section;
(25) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order,
including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital
property rights to an alternate payee;
(26) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
Page 10 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
participant, who is designated to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic
relations order;
(27) "University member" means an individual who becomes a member through
employment with an employer specified in subsection (4)(b) and (n) of this section;
(28) "Nonuniversity member" means an individual who becomes a member through
employment with an employer specified under subsection (4) of this section, except
for those members employed by an employer specified in subsection (4)(b) and (n)
of this section;
(29) "Accumulated employer contribution" means the employer contribution deposited
to a member's account through the supplemental benefit component and regular
interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS 161.635 for nonuniversity
members and KRS 161.636 for university members;
(30) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2022,
the member's accumulated contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1,
2022, the combined sum of the member's accumulated contributions and the
member's accumulated employer contributions;
(31) "Foundational benefit component" means the benefits provided by KRS 161.220 to
161.716 to individuals who become members on or after January 1, 2022, except
for the supplemental benefit component and retiree health benefits set forth in KRS
161.675; and
(32) "Supplemental benefit component" means:
(a) The benefit established pursuant to KRS 161.635 for individuals who become
nonuniversity members on or after January 1, 2022; or
(b) The benefit established pursuant to KRS 161.636 for individuals who become
university members on or after January 1, 2022.
Page 11 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
Section 2. KRS 161.230 is amended to read as follows:
The Teachers' Retirement System is established as of July 1, 1940, for the purpose of
providing retirement allowances for teachers, their beneficiaries, and survivors under the
provisions of KRS 161.155 and 161.220 to 161.714. The Teachers' Retirement System of
the State of Kentucky shall be an independent agency and instrumentality of the
Commonwealth and this status shall only be amended or changed by the General
Assembly. It shall have the powers and the privileges of a corporation and shall be known
as the "Teachers' Retirement System of the State of Kentucky." Its business shall be
transacted, its funds invested, and its cash and securities held in that name, or in the name
of its nominee or title holding organization provided that its nominee or title holding
organization is authorized by board of trustees' resolution solely for the purpose of
facilitating the transfer of securities or acquiring and holding title to real property. The
board of trustees may designate a nominee as provided in KRS 286.3-225; or it may
name as nominee a partnership composed of selected trustees and employees of the
system, and formed for the sole purpose of holding legal or registered title of such
securities, and for the transfer of securities in accordance with directions of the board of
trustees.
Section 3. KRS 161.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The general administration and management of the retirement system, and the
responsibility for its proper operation and for making effective provisions of
KRS 161.155 and 161.220 to 161.714 are vested in a board of trustees to be
known as the "Board of Trustees of the Teachers' Retirement System of the
State of Kentucky."
(b) The board of trustees shall consist of the following:
1. The chief state school officer;
2. The State Treasurer;
3. Two (2) trustees, appointed by the Governor of the Commonwealth,
Page 12 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
subject to Senate confirmation in accordance with KRS 11.160 for each
appointment or reappointment. These two (2) trustees shall have
investment experience. For purposes of this subparagraph, a trustee with
"investment experience" means an individual who does not have a
conflict of interest, as provided by KRS 161.460, and who has at least
ten (10) years of experience in one (1) of the following areas of
expertise:
a. A portfolio manager acting in a fiduciary capacity;
b. A professional securities analyst or investment consultant;
c. A current or retired employee or principal of a trust institution,
investment or finance organization, or endowment fund acting in
an investment-related capacity;
d. A chartered financial analyst in good standing as determined by
the CFA Institute; or
e. A university professor, teaching investment-related studies; and
4. Seven (7) other trustees elected as provided in KRS 161.260. Four (4) of
the elective trustees shall be members of the retirement system, to be
known as teacher trustees, two (2) shall be persons who are not
members of the teaching profession, to be known as the lay trustees, and
one (1) shall be an annuitant of the retirement system to be known as the
retired teacher trustee. One (1) teacher trustee shall be elected annually
for a four-year term. The retired teacher trustee shall be elected every
four (4) years. The chief state school officer and the State Treasurer are
considered ex officio members of the board of trustees and may
designate in writing a person to represent them at board meetings.
(c) 1. Elective trustees shall not serve more than three (3) consecutive four (4)
year terms. An elective trustee who has served three (3) consecutive
Page 13 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
terms may be elected again after an absence of four (4) years from the
board of trustees.
2. The term limits established by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall
apply to elective trustees serving on or after July 1, 2012, and all terms
of office served prior to July 1, 2012, shall be used to determine if the
elective trustee has exceeded the term limits provided by subparagraph
1. of this paragraph.
(d) 1. Each appointed trustee shall serve a term of four (4) years. An appointed
trustee shall not serve more than three (3) consecutive four (4) year
terms. An appointed trustee who has served three (3) consecutive terms
may be appointed again after an absence of four (4) years from the
board of trustees.
2. Any vacancy that occurs in an appointed position shall be filled in the
same manner that provides for the selection of the trustee; however, any
vacancy shall be filled only for the duration of the unexpired term.
(2) A member, retired member, or designated beneficiary may appeal the retirement
system's decisions that materially affect the amount of service retirement allowance,
amount of service credit, eligibility for service retirement, or eligibility for
survivorship benefits to which that member, retired member, or designated
beneficiary claims to be entitled. All appeals must be in writing and filed with the
retirement system within thirty (30) days of the claimant's first notice of the
retirement system's decision. For purposes of this section, notice shall be complete
and effective upon the date of mailing of the retirement system's decision to the
claimant at the claimant's last known address. Failure by the claimant to file a
written appeal with the retirement system within the thirty (30) day period shall
result in the decision of the retirement system becoming permanent with the effect
of a final and unappealable order. The deadline to file a written appeal shall not be
Page 14 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
subject to the jurisdiction of any court or appeal process, nor shall it otherwise be
tolled or waived. Appeals may include a request for an administrative hearing
which shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B.
The board of trustees may establish an appeals committee whose members shall be
appointed by the chairperson and who shall have the authority to act upon the report
and recommendation of the hearing officer by issuing a final order on behalf of the
full board of trustees. A member, retired member, or designated beneficiary who
has filed a timely, written appeal of a decision of the retirement system may,
following the administrative hearing and issuance of the final order by the board of
trustees, appeal the final order of the board of trustees to the Franklin Circuit Court
in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B.
(3) The board of trustees shall establish a formal trustee education program for all
trustees of the board. The program shall include but not be limited to the following:
(a) A required orientation program for all new trustees to the board. The
orientation program shall include training on:
1. Benefits and benefits administration;
2. Investment concepts, policies, and current composition and
administration of retirement system investments;
3. Laws, bylaws, and administrative regulations pertaining to the
retirement system and to fiduciaries; and
4. Actuarial and financial concepts pertaining to the retirement system.
If a trustee fails to complete the orientation program within one (1) year from
the beginning of his or her first term on the board, the retirement system shall
withhold payment of the per diem and travel expenses due to the board
member under KRS 161.290 until the trustee has completed the orientation
program;
(b) Annual required training for trustees on the administration, benefits,
Page 15 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
financing, and investing of the retirement system. If a trustee fails to complete
the annual required training during the calendar or fiscal year, the retirement
system shall withhold payment of the per diem and travel expenses due to the
board member under KRS 161.290 until the board member has met the annual
training requirements; and
(c) The retirement system shall incorporate by reference in an administrative
regulation, pursuant to KRS 13A.2251, the trustee education program.
(4) In order to improve public transparency regarding the administration of the system,
the board of trustees shall adopt a best practices model by posting the following
information to the retirement system's website and shall make available to the
public:
(a) Meeting notices and agendas for all meetings of the board. Notices and
agendas shall be posted to the retirement system's website at least seventy-two
(72) hours in advance of the board or committee meetings, except in the case
of special or emergency meetings as provided by KRS 61.823;
(b) The Annual Comprehensive Financial Report with the information as follows:
1. A general overview and update on the retirement system by the
executive secretary;
2. A listing of the board of trustees;
3. A listing of key staff;
4. An organizational chart;
5. Financial information, including a statement of plan net assets, a
statement of changes in plan net assets, an actuarial value of assets, a
schedule of investments, a statement of funded status and funding
progress, and other supporting data;
6. Investment information, including a general overview, a list of the
retirement system's professional consultants, a total net return on
Page 16 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
retirement system investments over a historical period, an investment
summary, contracted investment management expenses, transaction
commissions, and a schedule of investments;
7. The annual actuarial valuation report on the pension benefit and the
medical insurance benefit; and
8. A general statistical section, including information on contributions,
benefit payouts, and retirement system demographic data;
(c) All external audits;
(d) All board minutes or other materials that require adoption or ratification by
the board of trustees. The items listed in this paragraph shall be posted within
seventy-two (72) hours of adoption or ratification of the board;
(e) All bylaws, policies, or procedures adopted or ratified by the board of
trustees;
(f) The retirement system's summary plan description;
(g) The retirement system's law book;
(h) A listing of the members of the board of trustees and membership on each
committee established by the board, including any investment committees;
(i) All investment holdings in aggregate, fees, and commissions for each fund
administered by the board, which shall be updated on a quarterly basis for
fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2017. The system shall request from
all managers, partnerships, and any other available sources all information
regarding fees and commissions and shall, based on the requested information
received:
1. Disclose the dollar value of fees or commissions paid to each individual
manager or partnership;
2. Disclose the dollar value of any profit sharing, carried interest, or any
other partnership incentive arrangements, partnership agreements, or
Page 17 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
any other partnership expenses received by or paid to each manager or
partnership; and
3. As applicable, report each fee or commission by manager or partnership
consistent with standards established by the Institutional Limited
Partners Association (ILPA).
In addition to the requirements of this paragraph, the system shall also
disclose the name and address of all individual underlying managers or
partners in any fund of funds in which system assets are invested;
(j) An update of net of fees investment returns, asset allocations, and the
performance of the funds against benchmarks adopted by the board for each
fund, for each asset class administered by the board, and for each manager.
The update shall be posted on a quarterly basis for fiscal years beginning on
or after July 1, 2017;
(k) All contracts or offering documents for services, goods, or property purchased
or utilized by the system;
(l) A searchable database of the system's expenditures and a listing of each
individual employed by the system along with the employee's salary or wages.
In lieu of posting the information required by this paragraph to the system's
website, the system may provide the information through a website
established by the executive branch to inform the public about executive
branch agency expenditures and public employee salaries and wages; and
(m) All proxy vote reports as provided by KRS 161.430(8).
(5) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (4) of this section, the retirement
system shall not be required to furnish information that is protected under KRS
161.585, exempt under KRS 61.878, or that, if disclosed, would compromise the
retirement system's ability to competitively invest in real estate or other asset
classes, except that no provision of this section or KRS 61.878 shall exclude
Page 18 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
disclosure and review of all contracts, including investment contracts, by the board,
the Auditor of Public Accounts, and the Government Contract Review Committee
established pursuant to KRS 45A.705 or the disclosure of investment fees and
commissions as provided by this section. If any public record contains material
which is not excepted under this section, the system shall separate the excepted
material by removal, segregation, or redaction, and make the nonexcepted material
available for examination.
(6) For any benefit improvements the General Assembly has authorized the board of
trustees to establish under KRS 161.220 to 161.716 and that require formal
adoption by the board, the board shall establish the benefits by promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
Section 4. KRS 161.430 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The board of trustees shall be the trustee of the funds of the retirement system
and shall have full power and responsibility for the purchase, sale, exchange,
transfer, or other disposition of the investments and moneys of the retirement
system. The board shall, by administrative regulation, establish investment
policies and procedures to carry out their responsibilities.
(b) 1. The board shall contract with experienced competent investment
managers to invest and manage assets of the system. The board may also
employ qualified investment staff to advise it on investment matters and
to invest and manage assets of the system not to exceed fifty percent
(50%) of the system's assets. The board may contract with one (1) or
more general investment consultants, as well as specialized investment
consultants, to advise it on investment matters.
2. All internal investment staff and investment consultants shall adhere to
the Code of Ethics and Standards of Professional Conduct, and all board
trustees shall adhere to the Code of Conduct for Members of a Pension
Page 19 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
Scheme Governing Body, promulgated by the CFA Institute. Investment
managers shall comply with the federal Investment Advisers Act of
1940, as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder
and shall comply with all other applicable federal securities statutes and
related rules and regulations that apply to investment managers.
3. No investment manager shall manage more than forty percent (40%) of
the funds of the retirement system.
(c) The board may appoint an investment committee to act for the board in all
matters of investment, subject to the approval of the board of trustees. The
board of trustees, in keeping with their responsibilities as trustees and
wherever consistent with their fiduciary responsibilities, shall give priority to
the investment of funds in obligations calculated to improve the industrial
development and enhance the economic welfare of the Commonwealth.
Toward this end, the board shall develop procedures for informing the
business community of the potential for in-state investments by the retirement
fund, accepting and evaluating applications for the in-state investment of
funds, and working with members of the business community in executing in-
state investments which are consistent with the board's fiduciary
responsibilities. The board shall include in the criteria it uses to evaluate in-
state investments their potential for creating new employment opportunities
and adding to the total job pool in Kentucky. The board may cooperate with
the board of trustees of Kentucky Retirement Systems in developing its
program and procedures, and shall report to the Legislative Research
Commission annually on its progress in placing in-state investments. The first
report shall be submitted by October 1, 1991, and subsequent reports shall be
submitted by October 1 of each year thereafter. The report shall include the
number of applications for in-state investment received, the nature of the
Page 20 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
investments proposed, the amount requested, the amount invested, and the
percentage of applications which resulted in investments.
(2) (a) For the purposes of this subsection:
1. "Solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries" shall be
determined using only pecuniary factors and shall not include any
purpose to further a nonpecuniary interest;
2. "Pecuniary factor" means a consideration having a direct and material
connection to the financial risk or financial return of an investment;
3. A "material connection" is established if there is a substantial likelihood
that a reasonable investor would consider it important in determining the
financial risk or the financial return of an investment;
4. "Nonpecuniary interest" includes but is not limited to an environmental,
social, political, or ideological interest which does not have a direct and
material connection to the financial risk or financial return of an
investment; and
5. "Investment manager" and "investment consultant" shall have the same
definition attributed to "investment adviser" under the federal
Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. sec. 80b-2.
(b) The board members, investment managers, investment consultants, or other
fiduciaries, and proxy advisers shall discharge their duties with respect to the
assets of the system solely in the interests of the active contributing members
and annuitants and:
1. For the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to members and
annuitants and defraying reasonable expenses of administering the
system;
2. With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances
then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and
Page 21 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
familiar with these matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of
a like character and with like aims;
3. By diversifying the investments of the plan so as to minimize the risk of
large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to
do so; and
4. In accordance with the federal, state, and common laws, administrative
regulations, and other instruments governing the system and fiduciaries.
(c) Evidence that a fiduciary has considered or acted on a nonpecuniary interest
shall include but is not limited to:
1. Statements, explanations, reports, or correspondence;
2. Communications with portfolio companies;
3. Statements of principles or policies, whether made individually or
jointly;
4. Votes of shares or proxies; or
5. Coalitions, initiatives, agreements, or commitments to which the
fiduciary is a participant, affiliate, or signatory.
(3) (a) In choosing and contracting for professional investment management and
consulting services, the board shall do so prudently and in the interest of the
members and annuitants. Any contract that the board makes with an
investment manager shall set forth policies and guidelines of the board with
reference to standard rating services and specific criteria for determining the
quality of investments. Expenses directly related to investment management
and consulting services shall be financed from the guarantee fund in amounts
approved by the board.
(b) An investment manager or consultant appointed under this section shall
acknowledge in writing his or her fiduciary responsibilities to the fund. To be
eligible for appointment, an investment manager, consultant, or an affiliate,
Page 22 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
shall be:
1. Registered under the Federal Investment Advisers Act of 1940; or
2. A bank as defined by that Act; or
3. An insurance company qualified to perform investment services under
the laws of more than one (1) state.
(c) Proxy advisers and proxy voting services shall comply with all applicable
provisions of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended, and the rules
and regulations promulgated thereunder, and shall comply with all other
federal statutes and related rules and regulations that apply to proxy advisers
and proxy voting services.
(d) No contract or agreement, whether made in writing or not, shall in any
manner waive, restrict, or limit a fiduciary's liability as to any of the duties
imposed by this section. Any agreement shall specify that it is made in the
Commonwealth and governed by the laws of the Commonwealth, unless the
agreement is in commingled investments or real property outside the
Commonwealth, in which case the agreements may be made in or governed
by laws outside of the Commonwealth provided that the other requirements
of this section are met.
(4) No investment or disbursement of funds shall be made unless authorized by the
board of trustees, except that the board, in order to ensure timely market
transactions, shall establish investment guidelines and may permit its staff and
investment managers who are employed or under contract with the board pursuant
to this section to execute purchases and sales of investment instruments within
those guidelines without prior board approval.
(5) In discharging his or her administrative duties under this section, a trustee shall
strive to administer the retirement system in an efficient and cost-effective manner
for the taxpayers of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
Page 23 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS 161.220 to 161.716, no funds of the
Teachers' Retirement System, including fees and commissions paid to an
investment manager, private fund, or company issuing securities, who manages
systems assets, shall be used to pay fees and commissions to placement agents. For
purposes of this subsection, "placement agent" means a third-party individual, who
is not an employee, or firm, wholly or partially owned by the entity being hired,
who solicits investments on behalf of an investment manager, private fund, or
company issuing securities.
(7) All contracts for the investment or management of assets of the system shall not be
subject to KRS Chapters 45, 45A, 56, and 57. Instead, the board shall conduct the
following process to develop and adopt an investment procurement policy with
which all prospective contracts for the investment or management of assets of the
system shall comply:
(a) On or before July 1, 2017, the board shall consult with the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee to develop an
investment procurement policy, which shall be written to meet best practices
in investment management procurement;
(b) Thirty (30) days prior to adoption, the board shall tender the preliminary
investment procurement policy to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee for review and comment;
(c) Upon receipt of comments from the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee, the board shall choose to adopt
or not adopt any recommended changes;
(d) Upon adoption, the board shall tender the final investment procurement policy
to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her
designee;
(e) No later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the investment procurement
Page 24 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
policy, the secretary or his or her designee shall certify whether the board's
investment procurement policy meets or does not meet best practices for
investment management procurement; and
(f) Any amendments to the investment procurement policy shall adhere to the
requirements set forth by paragraphs (b) to (e) of this subsection.
(8) (a) The board shall adopt written proxy voting guidelines which are consistent
with the fiduciary duties and other requirements of this section.
(b) The board shall not adopt the recommendations of a proxy adviser or proxy
voting service and shall not allow such proxy adviser or proxy voting service
to vote on behalf of the system, unless the proxy adviser or proxy voting
service acknowledges in writing and accepts under contract its duties under
this section and commits to follow the board-adopted proxy voting guidelines
when voting the system's shares in order to comply with the board's fiduciary
duties and other responsibilities under this section.
(c) All shares held by or on behalf of the system, and which the system is entitled
to vote under state, federal, or common laws, shall be voted according to the
proxy voting guidelines adopted by the board and subject to the fiduciary
duties and other requirements of this section by:
1. The board, the investment committee of the board, or an employee or
employees of the system who are fiduciaries under this section and are
appointed or otherwise authorized by the board; or
2. A proxy adviser or proxy voting service that acknowledges in writing
and accepts under contract its duties under this section and commits to
follow the board-adopted proxy voting guidelines when voting the
system's shares in order to comply with the board's fiduciary duties and
other responsibilities under this section.
(d) All proxy votes shall be reported at least quarterly to the board. For each vote,
Page 25 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
the report shall provide:
1. The vote caption;
2. The date of the vote;
3. The company's name;
4. The vote cast for the system;
5. The recommendation of the company's management; and
6. If applicable, the recommendation of the proxy adviser or proxy voting
service.
Section 5. KRS 161.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The membership of the retirement system shall consist of all new members, all
present teachers, and all persons participating under the retirement system as of
June 30, 1986, except as provided in Acts 1938 (1st Ex. Sess.), Ch. 1, paragraph 29.
The board of trustees of the Teachers' Retirement System shall be responsible for
final determination of membership eligibility and may direct employers to take
whatever action that may be necessary to correct any error relating to membership.
(2) Service credit shall be forfeited upon withdrawal. If a member again enters service
it shall be as a new member, except that any teacher who withdraws by claiming his
or her deposits may repay the system the amount withdrawn plus interest and
reestablish his or her service credit as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Effective July 1, 1988, and thereafter, an active contributing member of the
retirement system with contributing service equal to one (1) year may regain service
credit by depositing in the teachers' savings fund the amount withdrawn with
interest at the rate to be set by the board of trustees, and computed from the first of
the month of withdrawal and including the month of redeposit.
(4) Effective July 1, 1974, any active contributing member with at least two (2) years
of contributing service credit who declined membership as provided in Acts 1938
(1st Ex. Sess.), Ch. 1, paragraph 29, may secure service credit for prior service, and
Page 26 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
for any subsequent service prior to date of membership, by depositing in the
teachers' savings fund contributions for each year of subsequent service prior to
date of membership, with interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) compounded
annually to the date of deposit.
(5) Membership in the retirement system shall be terminated:
(a) By retirement for service;
(b) By death;
(c) By withdrawal of the member's accumulated account balance;
(d) When a member, having less than five (5) years of Kentucky service is absent
from service for more than three (3) consecutive years; or
(e) For persons whose membership begins on or after August 1, 2000, when a
member is convicted, in any state or federal court of competent jurisdiction, of
a felony related to his or her employment as provided in subparagraphs 1. and
2. of this paragraph.
1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person whose
membership begins on or after August 1, 2000, who is convicted, in any
state or federal court of competent jurisdiction, of a felony related to his
or her employment shall forfeit rights and benefits earned under the
retirement system, except for the return of his or her accumulated
contributions and interest credited on those contributions through the
date of conviction.
2. The payment of retirement benefits ordered forfeited shall be stayed
pending any appeal of the conviction. If the conviction is reversed on
final judgment, no retirement benefits shall be forfeited.
Except for paragraph (e) of this subsection, upon termination of member accounts
under this subsection, funds in the account shall be transferred to the guarantee
fund. Inactive members may apply for refunds of these funds at any time. The
Page 27 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
terminated service shall be reinstated, if not withdrawn by the member, in the event
that the member returns to active contributing service.
(6) In case of withdrawal from service prior to eligibility for retirement, the board of
trustees shall on request of the member return all of his or her accumulated account
balance, including any payments made by the member to the state accumulation
fund, but the member shall have no claim on any contributions made by the state or
employer with a view to his or her retirement, except as provided by KRS 161.635
and 161.636, or to contributions made to the medical insurance fund. A member
who is withdrawing from service prior to retirement eligibility shall be entitled to a
refund following sixty (60) days after his or her last day of employment. If the
member is eligible for an immediate service retirement allowance as provided in
KRS 161.600, no withdrawal and refund shall be permitted, unless the allowance
would prohibit the member from qualifying for Social Security benefits or the
member elects to withdraw part or all of his or her service for the purpose of
obtaining service credit in another retirement plan. Requests for refund of
contributions by the member must be filed on forms prescribed by the Teachers'
Retirement System and the employer shall be financially responsible for all
information that is certified on the prescribed form. A member may not withdraw
any part of his or her accumulated account balance in the retirement system except
as provided by this subsection.
(7) Except as provided in KRS 161.520 and 161.525, in case of death prior to
retirement, the board of trustees shall pay to the estate of the deceased member,
unless a beneficiary was otherwise applicably designated by the deceased member,
then to the beneficiary, all of his or her accumulated account balance, including any
payments made by the member to the state accumulation fund, but the estate or
beneficiary shall have no claim on any contributions made by the state or employer
with a view to the retirement of the member, except as provided by KRS 161.635
Page 28 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
and 161.636, or to contributions made to the medical insurance fund.
(8) Any active contributing member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System,
the County Employees Retirement System, the State Police Retirement System, or
the Judicial Retirement System may use service, under that retirement system for
the purpose of meeting the service requirement of subsections (3) and (4) of this
section.
Section 6. KRS 161.585 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each member's or annuitant's account shall be administered in a confidential
manner, and specific data regarding a member or annuitant shall not be released for
publication, except that:
(a) The member or annuitant may authorize the release of his or her account
information;
(b) The board of trustees may release member or annuitant account information to
the employer or to other state and federal agencies as it deems necessary or in
response to a lawful subpoena or order issued by a court of law; or
(c) 1. Upon request by any person, the system shall release the following
information from the accounts of any member or annuitant of the
Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, if the member or annuitant is a
current or former officeholder in the Kentucky General Assembly:
a. The first and last name of the member or annuitant;
b. The status of the member or annuitant, including but not limited to
whether he or she is a contributing member, a member who is not
contributing but has not retired, a retiree receiving a monthly
retirement allowance, or a retiree who has returned to work
following retirement with an agency participating in the system;
c. If the individual is an annuitant, the monthly retirement allowance
that he or she was receiving at the end of the most recently
Page 29 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
completed fiscal year;
d. If the individual is a member who has not yet retired, the estimated
monthly retirement allowance that he or she is eligible to receive
on the first date he or she would be eligible for an unreduced
retirement allowance, using his or her service credit, accumulated
account balance, and final average salary at the end of the most
recently completed fiscal year; and
e. The current or last participating employer of the member or
annuitant, if applicable.
2. No information shall be disclosed under this paragraph from an account
that is paying benefits to a beneficiary due to the death of a member or
annuitant.
(2) The release of information under subsection (1)(c) of this section shall not
constitute a violation of the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(3) Medical records which are included in a member's or annuitant's file maintained by
the Teachers' Retirement System are confidential and shall not be released unless
authorized by the member or annuitant in writing or as otherwise provided by law
or in response to a lawful subpoena or order issued by a court of law. A member
appealing the denial of a disability retirement application and his or her legal
counsel shall be entitled to all written recommendations and reports submitted by
the medical review committee to the Teachers' Retirement System under KRS
161.661(14). Such recommendations and reports shall otherwise be maintained in
a confidential manner and shall not be subject to release under any conditions,
including in response to a subpoena or order issued by a court of law
notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary.
(4) (a) When a subpoena is served upon any employee of the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System requiring the production of any data, information, or
Page 30 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
records, it is sufficient if the employee of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the original, or
his or her designated staff, delivers[ within five (5) working days by certified
mail or by personal delivery to the person specified in the subpoena] either of
the following:
1. Legible and durable copies of records certified by the employee or
designated staff; or
2. An affidavit stating the information required by the subpoena.
(b) The production of records or an affidavit shall be in lieu of any personal
testimony of any employee of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System
unless, after the production of records or an affidavit, a separate subpoena is
served upon the retirement system specifically directing the testimony of an
employee of the retirement system. When a subpoena is served on any
employee of the retirement system requiring the employee to give testimony
or produce records for any purpose, in the absence of a court order requiring
the testimony of or production of records by a specific employee, the system
may designate an employee to give testimony or produce records upon the
matter referred to in the subpoena. The board of trustees may promulgate an
administrative regulation for the recovery of reasonable travel and
administrative expenses for those occasions when an employee of the
retirement system is required to travel from his or her home or office to
provide testimony or records. Recoverable expenses may include the travel
expenses, wages, salary, and overtime paid to the employee by the retirement
system for the period of time that the employee is away from the office. The
cost of these expenses shall be borne by the party issuing the subpoena
compelling the employee's travel. The board of trustees may also promulgate
an administrative regulation establishing a reasonable fee for the copying,
Page 31 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
compiling, and mailing of requested records.
(c) The certification required by this subsection shall be signed before a notary
public by the employee and shall include the full name of the member or
annuitant, the last four digits of the Social Security number of the member or
annuitant[ identification number assigned to the member or annuitant by the
retirement system], and a legend substantially to the following effect: "The
records are true and complete reproductions of the original, microfiched, or
electronically stored records which are housed in the retirement system's
office. This certification is given in lieu of the undersigned's personal
appearance."[
(d) When an affidavit or copies of records are personally delivered, a receipt shall
be presented to the person receiving the records for his or her signature and
shall be immediately signed and returned to the person delivering the records.
When an affidavit or copies of records are sent via certified mail, the receipt
used by the postal authorities shall be sufficient to prove receipt of the
affidavit or copies of records.]
(d)[(e)] When the affidavit or copies of records are delivered to a requesting
party for use in deposition they shall, after termination of the deposition, be
delivered by the requesting party personally or by certified mail to the clerk
of the court or other body before which the action or proceeding is pending.
(e)[(f)] Upon completion of delivery by the retirement system of copies of
records by their deposit in the mail or by their personal delivery to the
requesting party, the retirement system shall cease to have any responsibility
or liability for the records and their continued maintenance in a confidential
manner.
(f)[(g)] Records of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System that are
susceptible to reproduction may be proved as to foundation, identity, and
Page 32 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
authenticity without preliminary testimony, by use of legible and durable
copies, certified in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.
(g)[(h)] The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the
Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System from asserting any exemption,
exception, or relief provided under the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure or
other applicable law.
(5) For purposes of this section, "records" includes retirement estimates, affidavits, and
other documents prepared by or in the possession of the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System in response to information requested in a lawful subpoena or
order issued by a court of law.
Section 7. KRS 161.600 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An individual who becomes a member of the retirement system prior to January 1,
2022, may qualify for service retirement by meeting one (1) of the following
requirements:
(a) Attainment of age sixty (60) years and completion of five (5) years of
Kentucky service;
(b) 1. For an individual who becomes a member before July 1, 2008,
attainment of age fifty-five (55) years and completion of a minimum of
five (5) years of Kentucky service with an actuarial reduction of the
basic allowance of five percent (5%) for each year the member's age is
less than sixty (60) years or for each year the member's years of
Kentucky service credit is less than twenty-seven (27), whichever is the
lesser number; and
2. For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008,
attainment of age fifty-five (55) years and completion of a minimum of
ten (10) years of Kentucky service with an actuarial reduction of the
basic retirement allowance of six percent (6%) for each year the
Page 33 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
member's age is less than sixty (60) years or for each year the member's
years of Kentucky service credit is less than twenty-seven (27),
whichever is the lesser number;
(c) Completion of twenty-seven (27) years of Kentucky service. Out-of-state
service earned in accordance with the provisions of KRS 161.515(2) may be
used to meet this requirement; or
(d) Completion of the necessary years of service under provisions of KRS
61.559(2)(c) if the member is retiring under the reciprocity provisions of KRS
61.680. A member retiring under this paragraph who has not attained age
fifty-five (55) shall incur an actuarial reduction of the basic allowance
determined by the system's actuary for each year the member's service credit
is less than twenty-seven (27).
(2) An individual who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after January
1, 2022, shall, except as adjusted by the board pursuant to KRS 161.633 or 161.634,
as applicable, be eligible to retire upon attainment of:
(a) Age sixty-five (65) and completion of a minimum of five (5) years of
Kentucky service;
(b) Age sixty (60) and completion of a minimum of ten (10) years of Kentucky
service;
(c) Age fifty-seven (57) and completion of a minimum of thirty (30) years of
Kentucky service; or
(d) Age fifty-seven (57) and completion of a minimum of ten (10) years of
Kentucky service with an actuarial reduction of the basic retirement allowance
of six percent (6%) for each year the member's age is less than sixty (60)
years or for each year the member's years of Kentucky service credit is less
than thirty (30), whichever is the lesser number.
(3) Any person who has been a member in Kentucky for twenty-seven (27) years or
Page 34 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
more and who withdraws from covered employment may continue to pay into the
fund each year until the end of the fiscal year in which he or she reaches the age of
sixty-five (65) years, the current contribution rate based on the annual
compensation received during the member's last full year in covered employment,
less any payment received for accrued sick leave or accrued leave from an
employer. The member shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance as
provided in KRS 161.620 at any time after withdrawing from covered employment
and payment of contributions under this subsection. No member shall make
contributions as provided for in this subsection if the member is at the same time
making contributions to another retirement system in Kentucky supported wholly or
in part by public funds.
(4) Service credit in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the State Police
Retirement System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, the County Employees
Retirement System, or the Judicial Retirement System may be used in meeting the
service requirements of subsections (1)(a) to (c) and (2) of this section, provided the
service is subsequent to July 1, 1956.
(5) Upon death, disability, or service retirement, a member's accounts under all state
supported retirement systems shall be consolidated, as provided by this section and
by KRS 61.680, for the purpose of determining eligibility and amount of benefits,
which shall include medical benefits. Upon determination of benefits, each system
shall pay the applicable percentage of total benefits. The effective date of retirement
under this subsection shall be determined by each retirement system for the portion
of the payments that will be made.
(6) No retirement annuity shall be effective until written application and option election
forms are filed with the retirement office in accordance with administrative
regulations of the board of trustees. A member may withdraw his or her retirement
application, postpone his or her effective retirement date, or change his or her
Page 35 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
retirement option if these elections are made no later than the fifteenth day of the
month in which the member has made application for retirement. The deadline for
making these changes shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of any court or
appeal process, nor shall it otherwise be tolled or waived.
(7) The surviving spouse of an active contributing member, if named as beneficiary of
the member's account, may purchase retirement credit that the member was eligible
to purchase prior to the member's death.
Section 8. KRS 161.624 is amended to read as follows:
The employees of the Teachers' Retirement System shall endeavor to provide full and
complete information to all inquiries presented by members or beneficiaries of members.
The members or beneficiaries of the members shall assume full responsibility for
obtaining adequate and sufficient information concerning their eligibility for retirement
benefits, for selection of the type of benefit available to them, filing and other deadlines,
and for adherence to the employment restrictions applicable to retired members.
Section 9. KRS 161.630 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A member, upon retirement, shall receive a retirement allowance in the form
of a life annuity, with refundable balance, as provided in KRS 161.620, unless
an election is made before the effective date of retirement to receive
actuarially equivalent benefits under options which the board of trustees
approves.
(b) An individual who is participating in the supplemental benefit component as
provided by KRS 161.635 or 161.636 may, before the effective date of
retirement, elect to receive his or her accumulated account balance accrued in
the supplemental benefit component annuitized into a monthly payment under
one (1) of the actuarial equivalent payment options approved by the board of
trustees.
(c) No option shall provide for a benefit with an actuarial value at the age of
Page 36 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
retirement greater than that provided in KRS 161.620, 161.635(5)(a), or
161.636(5)(a), as applicable. This section does not apply to disability
allowances as provided in KRS 161.661(1).
(2) The retirement option chosen by a retiree at the time of service retirement shall
remain in force unless the retiree elects to make a change under the following
conditions:
(a) A divorce, annulment, or marriage dissolution following retirement shall, at
the election of the retiree, cancel any optional plan selected at retirement that
provides indefinitely continuing benefits to a spousal beneficiary and return
the retiree to a single lifetime benefit equivalent as determined by the board;
or
(b) Following marriage or remarriage, or the death of the designated beneficiary,
a retiree may elect a new optional plan of payment based on the actuarial
equivalent of a single lifetime benefit at the time of the election, as
determined by the board. The plan shall become effective the first of the
month following receipt of an application on a form approved by the board.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a beneficiary designation shall not be
changed after the effective date of retirement except for retirees who elect the life
annuity with refundable balance or the predetermined years certain and life
thereafter option. A member may remove a beneficiary at any time, but shall not
designate a substitute beneficiary. If a member elects to remove a beneficiary, the
member's retirement allowance shall not change regardless of the retirement option
selected by the member, even if the removed beneficiary predeceases the member.
A member who is subject to the beneficiary designation restriction of this
subsection shall only be allowed to name a new beneficiary when experiencing a
qualifying event under subsection (2) of this section, and shall make this change
within the deadline established in subsection (4) of this section.
Page 37 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
(4) A member who experiences a qualifying event under subsection (2) of this section
and who elects a new optional plan of payment shall make that election within sixty
(60) days of the qualifying event. The deadline for electing a new optional plan of
payment or for changing a beneficiary shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of
any court or appeal process, nor shall it otherwise be tolled or waived.
Section 10. KRS 161.635 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An individual who becomes a nonuniversity member of the Teachers' Retirement
System on or after January 1, 2022, shall receive the retirement benefits provided
by this section in addition to the retirement benefits provided under KRS 161.620.
The retirement benefits provided by this section shall be known as the supplemental
benefit component.
(2) The supplemental benefit component shall provide a benefit based upon a member's
accumulated account balance which shall include:
(a) Mandatory contributions made by the member as provided by KRS
161.540(1)(c)2.;
(b) Voluntary contributions made by the member, which may include lump-sum
payments;
(c) Mandatory contributions made by the employer as provided by KRS
161.550(1)(d)2.;
(d) Voluntary employer contributions; and
(e) Regular interest, which shall be credited to the member's account annually on
June 30 of each fiscal year, by multiplying the member's accumulated account
balance in the supplemental benefit component on June 30 of the preceding
fiscal year by the regular interest rate.
(3) (a) Member contributions and employer contributions as provided by subsection
(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall be credited to the member's account at least
monthly as contributions are reported and posted to the system in accordance
Page 38 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
with KRS 161.560.
(b) No employer contributions or interest shall be provided to a member who has
taken a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS
161.470 or who has retired and annuitized his or her accumulated account
balance as authorized by this section.
(4) (a) Upon termination of employment, a member who has less than five (5) years
of service credited under KRS 161.500, who elects to take a refund of his or
her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS 161.470, shall forfeit
the accumulated employer contribution, and shall only receive a refund of his
or her accumulated contributions.
(b) Upon termination of employment, a member who has five (5) or more years
of service credited under KRS 161.500, who elects to take a refund of his or
her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS 161.470, shall receive a
full refund of his or her accumulated account balance.
(5) A nonuniversity member eligible to retire under KRS 161.600(2) may upon
retirement, in addition to the other benefits provided by KRS 161.620, elect to:
(a) Have all or a portion of his or her accumulated account balance in the
supplemental benefit component annuitized into a lifetime monthly retirement
allowance by the system in accordance with the actuarial assumptions and
actuarial methods adopted by the board for the supplemental benefit
component and in effect on the member's retirement date;
(b) Receive the actuarial equivalent of his or her retirement allowance calculated
under paragraph (a) of this subsection payable under one (1) of the options
established by the board pursuant to KRS 161.630;
(c) Take a distribution of the accumulated account balance in the supplemental
benefit component over a period certain as authorized by the board; or
(d) Take a full or partial refund of his or her accumulated account balance as
Page 39 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
provided by KRS 161.470.
A member participating in the supplemental benefit component shall not be
required to take a distribution or annuitize his or her accumulated account balance
in the supplemental benefit component when he or she begins drawing a retirement
allowance from the foundational benefit component and may instead choose to
begin drawing a distribution or annuitize his or her accumulated account balance in
the supplemental benefit component at any date following his or her retirement date
from the foundational benefit component.
(6) This section only applies to individuals who become nonuniversity members of the
Teachers' Retirement System on or after January 1, 2022.
(7) The board of trustees shall have the authority to utilize or establish any plan or
plans authorized under the Internal Revenue Code to provide the benefits set forth
in this section.
Section 11. KRS 161.636 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An individual who becomes a university member of the Teachers' Retirement
System on or after January 1, 2022, shall receive the retirement benefits provided
by this section in addition to the retirement benefits provided under KRS 161.620.
The retirement benefits provided by this section shall be known as the supplemental
benefit component.
(2) The supplemental benefit component shall provide a benefit based upon a member's
accumulated account balance which shall include:
(a) Mandatory contributions made by the member as provided by KRS
161.540(1)(d)2.;
(b) Voluntary contributions made by the member, which may include lump-sum
payments;
(c) Mandatory contributions made by the employer as provided by KRS
161.550(1)(e)2.;
Page 40 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
(d) Voluntary employer contributions; and
(e) Regular interest, which shall be credited to the member's account annually on
June 30 of each fiscal year, by multiplying the member's accumulated account
balance in the supplemental benefit component on June 30 of the preceding
fiscal year by the regular interest rate.
(3) (a) Member contributions and employer contributions as provided by subsection
(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall be credited to the member's account at least
monthly as contributions are reported and posted to the system in accordance
with KRS 161.560.
(b) No employer contributions or interest shall be provided to a member who has
taken a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS
161.470 or who has retired and annuitized his or her accumulated account
balance as authorized by this section.
(4) (a) Upon termination of employment, a member who has less than five (5) years
of service credited under KRS 161.500, who elects to take a refund of his or
her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS 161.470, shall forfeit
the accumulated employer contribution, and shall only receive a refund of his
or her accumulated contributions.
(b) Upon termination of employment, a member who has five (5) or more years
of service credited under KRS 161.500, who elects to take a refund of his or
her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS 161.470, shall receive a
full refund of his or her accumulated account balance.
(5) A university member eligible to retire under KRS 161.600(2) may upon retirement,
in addition to the other benefits provided by KRS 161.620, elect to:
(a) Have all or a portion of his or her accumulated account balance in the
supplemental benefit component annuitized into a lifetime monthly retirement
allowance by the system in accordance with the actuarial assumptions and
Page 41 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
actuarial methods adopted by the board for the supplemental benefit
component and in effect on the member's retirement date;
(b) Receive the actuarial equivalent of his or her retirement allowance calculated
under paragraph (a) of this subsection payable under one (1) of the options
established by the board pursuant to KRS 161.630;
(c) Take a distribution of the accumulated account balance in the supplemental
benefit component over a period certain as authorized by the board; or
(d) Take a full or partial refund of his or her accumulated account balance as
provided by KRS 161.470.
A member participating in the supplemental benefit component shall not be
required to take a distribution or annuitize his or her accumulated account balance
in the supplemental benefit component when he or she begins drawing a retirement
allowance from the foundational benefit component and may instead choose to
begin drawing a distribution or annuitize his or her accumulated account balance in
the supplemental benefit component at any date following his or her retirement date
from the foundational benefit component.
(6) This section only applies to individuals who become university members of the
Teachers' Retirement System on or after January 1, 2022.
(7) The board of trustees shall have the authority to utilize or establish any plan or
plans authorized under the Internal Revenue Code to provide the benefits set forth
in this section.
Section 12. KRS 161.661 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any member who is accredited by the Teachers' Retirement System for five
(5) or more years of service in Kentucky after July 1, 1941, may retire for
disability and be granted a disability allowance if found to be eligible as
provided in this section. Application for disability benefits shall be made
within one (1) year of the last contributing service in Kentucky, and the
Page 42 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
disability must have occurred during the most recent period of employment in
a position covered by the Teachers' Retirement System and subsequent to the
accreditation by the Teachers' Retirement System of five (5) years of
retirement system service credit in Kentucky. The deadline for filing an
application for disability benefits shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of
any court or appeal process, nor shall it otherwise be tolled or waived. A
disability occurring during the regular vacation immediately following the last
period of active service in Kentucky or during an official leave for which the
member is entitled to make regular contributions to the retirement system,
shall be considered as having occurred during a period of active service.
(b) The annual disability allowance shall be equal to sixty percent (60%) of the
member's final average salary.
(c) The following individuals shall not be eligible for disability benefits under
this section:
1. Members with twenty-seven (27) or more years of service credit; and
2. Individuals who become members on or after July 1, 2021, who are
eligible for an unreduced benefit under KRS 161.600(1)(b)2. or (d).
(2) The provisions of KRS 161.520, 161.525, and subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this
section shall not apply to disability retirees whose benefits were calculated on the
service retirement formula nor to survivors of these members.
(3) Members shall earn one (1) year of entitlement to disability retirement, at sixty
percent (60%) of the member's final average salary, for each four (4) years of
service in a covered position, but any member meeting the service requirement for
disability retirement shall be credited with no less than five (5) years of eligibility.
(4) A member retired by reason of disability shall continue to earn service credit at the
rate of one (1) year for each year retired for disability. This service shall be credited
to the member's account at the expiration of entitlement as defined in subsection (3)
Page 43 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
of this section, or when the member's eligibility for disability benefits is terminated
upon recommendation of a medical review committee, and this service shall be
used in calculating benefits as provided in subsection (5) of this section, but under
no circumstances shall this service be used to provide the member with more than
twenty-seven (27) years of total service credit. The service credit shall be valued at
the same level as service earned by active members as provided under KRS 161.600
or 161.620.
(5) Any member retired by reason of disability and remaining disabled at the expiration
of the entitlement period shall have his or her disability benefits recalculated using
the service retirement formula with service credit earned as set out in subsection (4)
of this section. The retirement allowance shall be calculated as set forth in KRS
161.620, except that those persons less than sixty (60) years of age shall be
considered as sixty (60) years of age. Members having their disability benefits
recalculated under this subsection shall not be entitled to a benefit based upon an
average of their three (3) highest salaries as set forth in KRS 161.220(9), unless
approved otherwise by the board of trustees.
(6) Members who have their disability retirement allowance recalculated at the
expiration of the entitlement period shall continue to have coverage under the post-
retirement medical insurance program. Restrictions on employment shall remain in
effect until the member attains age seventy (70) or until the member's eligibility is
discontinued. KRS 161.520 and 161.525 shall not apply to survivors of disability
retirees whose retirement allowances have been recalculated at the expiration of the
entitlement period. Members who have their disability retirement allowance
recalculated at the expiration of their entitlement period shall be entitled to a
minimum monthly allowance of five hundred dollars ($500) as the basic straight
life annuity. The minimum allowance shall be effective July 1, 1992, and shall
apply to those members who have had their allowance recalculated prior to that date
Page 44 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
and to disability retirees who will have their benefit allowance recalculated on or
after that date. For individuals who become members on or after July 1, 2021,
disability retirement payments and any other recurring payments payable by any
other state-administered retirement system shall be applied to reduce, on a dollar-
for-dollar basis, the minimum monthly disability retirement allowance payable
under this subsection.
(7) Effective July 1, 1992, members retired for disability prior to July 1, 1964, shall be
entitled to a minimum monthly allowance of five hundred dollars ($500) as their
basic straight life annuity and their surviving spouse shall be eligible for survivor
benefits as provided in KRS 161.520(1)(a) and (b).
(8) Any member retired by reason of disability may voluntarily waive disability
benefits and [return to teaching or ]any member, who is immediately eligible for
service retirement[age sixty (60) years or older], may elect to waive disability
benefits and retire for service on the basis of service credited to the member on the
effective date of the disability retirement.
(9) In order to qualify for retirement by reason of disability a member must suffer from
a physical or mental condition presumed to be permanent in duration and of a
nature as to render the member incapable of being gainfully employed in a covered
position. The incapability must be revealed by a competent examination by a
licensed physician or physicians and must be approved by a majority of a medical
review committee.
(10) A member retired by reason of disability shall be required to undergo periodic
examinations at the discretion of the board of trustees to determine whether the
disability allowance shall be continued. When examination and recommendation of
a medical review committee indicate the disability no longer exists, the allowance
shall be discontinued. Failure to undergo examinations and provide the Teachers'
Retirement System with requested medical documentation shall result in a
Page 45 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
suspension of disability benefits.
(11) Eligibility for payment shall begin on the first day of the month following receipt of
the application in the Teachers' Retirement System office, or the first of the month
next following the last payment of salary or sick leave benefits by the employer,
whichever is the later date.
(12) No person who receives a disability allowance may be employed in a position that
entails duties or qualification requirements similar to positions subject to
participation in the retirement system either within or without the State of
Kentucky. So doing shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall result in loss of the
allowance from the first date of this service. For purposes of this subsection and
subsection (13) of this section, "employment" and "occupation," and derivatives
thereof, mean any activity engaged in by the member receiving disability allowance
from which income is earned. A member who applies for and is approved for
disability retirement on or after July 1, 2002, and whose annual disability benefit is
less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) may earn income in any occupation other
than covered employment only to the extent that the annual income from the other
employment when added to the annual disability benefit does not exceed forty
thousand dollars ($40,000). For any member who exceeds this limit as a result of
income from other employment, the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System shall
reduce the member's disability benefit on a dollar-for-dollar basis for each dollar
that the member's combined annual disability benefit and annual income from other
employment exceeds forty thousand dollars ($40,000). The board of trustees may
annually increase the forty thousand dollar ($40,000) limit by the percentage
increase in the annual average of the consumer price index for all urban consumers
for the most recent calendar year as published by the Federal Bureau of Labor
Statistics, not to exceed five percent (5%). The retirement system may require
income and employment verification from the member, including but not limited to
Page 46 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
copies of tax returns and federal forms W-2 and W-4P. Failure to provide the
Teachers' Retirement System with requested income and employment verification
documentation shall result in a suspension of disability benefits. Submission of
false or fraudulent documentation shall, in addition to criminal penalties, result
in disqualification of all disability benefits from the date the fraudulent
documentation was submitted.
(13) All members who applied for disability retirement before July 1, 2002, and were
approved as a result of that application shall be subject to the income limitations as
they existed on June 30, 2002, until July 1, 2006. Effective July 1, 2006, the
twenty-seven thousand dollar ($27,000) limitation shall be increased to forty
thousand dollars ($40,000) and may be adjusted by the board of trustees by the
consumer price index in the manner described in subsection (12) of this section.
The recipient of a disability allowance who engages in any gainful occupation other
than covered employment must make a report of the duties involved, compensation
received, and any other pertinent information required by the board of trustees. The
retirement system may require income and employment verification from the
member, including but not limited to copies of tax returns and federal forms W-2
and W-4P. Failure to provide the Teachers' Retirement System with requested
income and employment verification documentation shall result in a suspension
of disability benefits. Submission of false or fraudulent documentation shall, in
addition to criminal penalties, result in disqualification of all disability benefits
from the date the fraudulent documentation was submitted.
(14) The board of trustees shall designate medical review committees, each consisting of
three (3) licensed physicians. A medical review committee shall pass upon all
applications for disability retirement and upon all applicant statements, medical
certifications, and examinations submitted in connection with disability
applications. The disposition of each case shall be recommended by a medical
Page 47 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
review committee in writing to the retirement system. Members of a medical review
committee shall follow administrative regulations regarding procedures as the board
of trustees may enact and shall be paid reasonable fees and expenses as authorized
by the board of trustees in compliance with the provisions of KRS 161.330 and
161.340. The retirement system may secure additional medical examinations and
information as it deems necessary. A member may appeal any final agency decision
denying his or her disability retirement application pursuant to the provisions of
KRS 161.250(2). In the event of such an appeal, the member and his or her legal
counsel shall be entitled to all written recommendations and reports submitted by
the medical review committee to the Teachers' Retirement System. Such
recommendations and reports shall otherwise be maintained in a confidential
manner and shall not be subject to release under any conditions including in
response to a subpoena or order issued by a court of law notwithstanding any
other statute to the contrary.
(15) A disability may be presumed to be permanent if the condition creating the
disability may be reasonably expected to continue for one (1) year or more from the
date of application for disability benefits.
(16) Any member who has voluntarily waived disability benefits or whose disability
benefits have been discontinued on recommendation of a medical review
committee, may apply for reinstatement of disability benefits. The application for
reinstatement must be made to the retirement system within twelve (12) months of
the date disability benefits terminated. If the termination of benefits were voluntary,
the reinstatement may be made without medical examination if application is made
within three (3) months of the termination date. Other applications for reinstatement
will be processed in the same manner as new applications for benefits.
(17) No person who is receiving disability benefits under this section may be employed
in a position which qualifies the person for membership in a retirement system
Page 48 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
financed wholly or in part with public funds. Employment in a position prohibited
by this subsection shall result in disqualification for those disability benefits from
the date of employment in the prohibited position.
(18) Any person who is receiving benefits and becomes disqualified from receiving
those benefits under this section, or becomes disqualified from receiving a portion
of those benefits due to income from other than covered employment, shall
immediately notify the Teachers' Retirement System of this disqualification in
writing and shall return all benefits paid after the date of disqualification. Failure to
comply with these provisions shall create an indebtedness of that person to the
Teachers' Retirement System. Interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum,
beginning on the date the written notice of disqualification is sent, shall be
charged if the debt is not repaid within sixty (60) days after the date of written
notice of disqualification. Failure to repay this debt creates a lien in favor of the
Teachers' Retirement System upon all property of the person who improperly
receives benefits and does not repay those benefits. The Teachers' Retirement
System may, in order to collect an outstanding debt, reduce or terminate any benefit
that a member is otherwise entitled to receive.
(19) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, individuals who
become members on or after January 1, 2022, shall be eligible for an actuarially
determined disability benefit as prescribed by the board of trustees via
administrative regulations promulgated by the board. The board of trustees shall
arrange by appropriate contract or on a self-insured basis a disability plan to
provide the disability benefits and may adjust the benefits in accordance with KRS
161.633(3) or 161.634(3).
Section 13. KRS 161.680 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If any change or error in a record results in any individual receiving from the
retirement system more or less than the individual was entitled to receive as
Page 49 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
determined by the board of trustees or staff of the Teachers' Retirement System,
the board of trustees or staff shall, when the error is discovered, correct the error,
and as far as practicable adjust the payments so that the actuarial equivalent of the
benefit to which the individual was entitled shall be paid.
(2) The Teachers' Retirement System shall take all practicable and cost-effective steps
to collect overpayments from a member's or retiree's account. Methods of
correction of overpayments from any member's or retiree's account shall include but
are not limited to reclamation of the overpayment from the member's or retiree's
account at the depository bank, the deduction of moneys from account refunds,
deduction from the retirement allowance or joint and survivor annuity payable from
the account, and deduction of moneys from the life insurance benefit. Collection of
overpayments shall be initiated regardless of the designated beneficiary for any
amounts payable from the account.
Section 14. KRS 56.8605 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 56.860 to 56.869:
(1) "Authorized project" means:
(a) Any project approved by the General Assembly and included in an enacted
budget; or
(b) Any project approved by the General Assembly that is certified by the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet in accordance with the
provisions of KRS 56.870, to be of a type that will independently produce
revenues or will be payable from receipts of federal transportation funds that
are projected by the commission to be sufficient to fully meet debt service,
issuance costs, reserve fund requirements, insurance premiums, or any other
expenditures necessary for financing so that no appropriation of state funds is
required;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Finance and Administration Cabinet;
Page 50 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
(3) "Commercial paper" means obligations that by their terms mature not more than
three hundred sixty-six (366) days from the date of their issuance and that may be
refunded;
(4) "Commission" means the Kentucky Asset/Liability Commission;
(5) "Estimated revenues" means the official revenue estimates established pursuant to
KRS 48.120 on or before the dates on which tax and revenue anticipation notes are
awarded to the purchaser;
(6) "Financial agreements" means interest rate swaps, options, or other agreements
between two (2) parties to exchange or have the conditional right to exchange
interest rate exposure from fixed rate to variable rate or from variable rate to fixed
rate, or to provide other economic benefit to an issuance of notes or a portfolio of
notes, or to hedge the net interest margin of the Commonwealth;
(7) "Financing agreement" means an agreement between the commission and the
cabinet, or between the cabinet and a state agency, relating to the funding of
projects or items associated with projects as described in KRS 56.867(3), a
judgment against a state agency or the Commonwealth, or the finance or refinance
of obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2)[ or 161.553(2)]. The provisions of a
financing agreement shall require either the cabinet to make payments to the
commission relating to the commission's issuance of notes, or the state agency to
make payments to the cabinet reimbursing the cabinet for its payments to the
commission on the agency's behalf. The obligations of the cabinet or the state
agency under a financing agreement shall be contingent upon appropriations by the
General Assembly to the cabinet or to the agency for the payment of those
obligations;
(8) "Fixed-rate obligations" means obligations on which the interest rate remains
constant to maturity;
(9) "Funding notes" means notes issued under the provisions of KRS 56.860 to 56.869
Page 51 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
by the commission for the purpose of funding:
(a) Judgments, with a final maturity of not more than ten (10) years; and
(b) The finance or refinance of obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2)[ or
161.553(2)];
(10) "Interest-sensitive assets" means tangible and intangible property held by the
Commonwealth whose market value is dependent upon the level of interest rates;
(11) "Interest-sensitive liabilities" means interest-bearing debts or other obligations of
the Commonwealth or a state agency;
(12) "Multimodal obligations" means obligations for which the time period for
establishing the rate of interest may be selectively determined and altered;
(13) "Net interest margin" means the net income or expense associated with the
difference between the Commonwealth's interest-sensitive assets and interest-
sensitive liabilities;
(14) "Project notes" means notes issued under the provisions of KRS 56.860 to 56.869
by the commission with a final maturity of not more than twenty (20) years for the
purpose of funding authorized projects, which may include bond anticipation notes;
(15) "State agency" means any state administrative body, agency, department, or
division as defined in KRS 42.005, and set out in KRS Chapter 12, or any board,
commission, institution, state university, or division exercising any function of the
Commonwealth;
(16) "Tax and revenue anticipation notes" means notes that are issued under the
provisions of KRS 56.860 to 56.869 by the commission with a final maturity that is
no later than the last day of the fiscal year during which the tax and revenue
anticipation notes are issued and that are issued in anticipation of estimated
revenues to be received in that fiscal year; and
(17) "Variable-rate demand obligations" means obligations on which the rate of interest
is set by reference to a predetermined index or formula, by auction, by an agent
Page 52 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
that, in the sole judgment of the commission, has the financial expertise to establish
market interest rates, or by similar means.
Section 15. KRS 56.868 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission may issue and sell funding notes for the purposes of funding
judgments against the Commonwealth or any state agency and financing or
refinancing obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2)[ or 161.553(2)]. Funding notes
may be sold and issued in a manner and have terms relating to the payment of
interest, principal, and premiums or discounts as market conditions warrant.
(2) Appropriations requests for payment of principal and interest on funding notes shall
be made by the state agency against which a judgment has been rendered or, in the
case of financing or refinancing obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2)[ or
161.553(2)], to the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System. Funding notes, together
with interest thereon, shall be repaid from payments received by the commission
from the cabinet under a financing agreement.
(3) Funding notes may be issued for the following purposes:
(a) To pay for judgments, which shall include legal settlements, court-ordered
actions against the Commonwealth or any state agency, and any part of any
expense or cost incidental to legal settlements or court-ordered actions against
the Commonwealth or any state agency;
(b) To finance or refinance obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2)[ or
161.553(2)]; and
(c) To refund outstanding issues of funding notes.
(4) The issuance of funding notes shall be subject to KRS 56.870, to approval by the
State Property and Buildings Commission, and to review by the Capital Projects
and Bond Oversight Committee pursuant to KRS 45.810.
(5) The cabinet, in providing for the expenditure of funds for any of the purposes
mentioned in this section, may provide by a financing agreement with the state
Page 53 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
agency so affected for the funding of the Commonwealth's or that state agency's
judgment, and the state agency so affected is authorized to enter into a financing
agreement with the cabinet for that purpose.
(6) Funding notes shall not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or any political
subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any
political subdivision, but the notes shall be payable solely from payments received
under the financing agreement relating to the funding notes.
Section 16. KRS 161.550 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each employer, except as provided under KRS 161.555, shall contribute annually to
the Teachers' Retirement System a permanent employer contribution rate on behalf
of each employee it employs equal to:
(a) Thirteen and one hundred five thousandths percent (13.105%) of the total
annual compensation of nonuniversity members who become members prior
to July 1, 2008. Of this permanent employer contribution rate:
1. Twelve and three hundred fifty-five thousandths percent (12.355%) of
the total annual compensation shall be used to fund pension and life
insurance benefits; and
2. Three-quarters of a percent (0.75%) of annual compensation shall be
used to provide funding to the medical insurance fund as provided under
KRS 161.420(5). If the board of trustees establishes a trust fund under
26 U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may deposit the employer contribution
provided in this subparagraph in that trust fund;
(b) Fourteen and one hundred five thousandths percent (14.105%) of the total
annual compensation of nonuniversity members who become members on or
after July 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2022. Of this permanent employer
contribution rate:
1. Thirteen and three hundred fifty-five thousandths percent (13.355%) of
Page 54 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
the total annual compensation shall be used to fund pension and life
insurance benefits; and
2. Three-quarters of a percent (0.75%) of annual compensation shall be
used to provide funding to the medical insurance fund as provided under
KRS 161.420(5). If the board of trustees establishes a trust fund under
26 U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may deposit the employer contribution
provided in this subparagraph in that trust fund;
(c) Thirteen and sixty-five hundredths percent (13.65%) of the total annual
compensation of university members who become members prior to January
1, 2022. Of this permanent employer contribution rate:
1. Ten and eight hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (10.875%) of
the total annual compensation shall be used to fund pension and life
insurance benefits; and
2. Two and seven hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (2.775%) of
annual compensation shall be used to provide funding to the medical
insurance fund as provided under KRS 161.420(5). If the board of
trustees establishes a trust fund under 26 U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may
deposit the employer contribution provided in this subparagraph in that
trust fund;
(d) Ten and three-quarters percent (10.75%) of the total annual compensation of
nonuniversity members who become members on or after January 1, 2022. Of
this permanent employer contribution rate:
1. Eight percent (8%) of the total annual compensation shall be used to
fund pension and life insurance benefits. The contribution provided by
this subparagraph shall not be used to fund the supplemental benefit
account as provided by KRS 161.635;
2. Two percent (2%) of the total annual compensation shall be used to fund
Page 55 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
the mandatory employer contribution of the supplemental benefit
component, except that the board may direct these contributions on a
prospective basis into the pension and life insurance funds to contain
costs within the provisions of KRS 161.633; and
3. Three-quarters of one percent (0.75%) of annual compensation shall be
used to provide funding to the medical insurance fund as provided under
KRS 161.420(5). If the board of trustees establishes a trust fund under
26 U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may deposit the employer contribution
provided in this subdivision in that trust fund; and
(e) Nine and seven hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (9.775%) of total
annual compensation of university members who become members on or after
January 1, 2022. Of this permanent employer contribution rate:
1. Five and seven hundred seventy-five thousandths percent (5.775%) of
the total annual compensation shall be used to fund pension and life
insurance benefits. The contribution provided by this subparagraph shall
not be used to fund the supplemental benefit account as provided by
KRS 161.636;
2. Two percent (2%) of the total annual compensation shall be used to fund
the mandatory employer contribution of the supplemental benefit
component, except that the board may direct these contributions on a
prospective basis into the pension and life insurance funds to contain
costs within the provisions of KRS 161.634; and
3. Two percent (2%) of annual compensation shall be used to provide
funding to the medical insurance fund as provided under KRS
161.420(5). If the board of trustees establishes a trust fund under 26
U.S.C. sec. 115, the board may deposit the employer contribution
provided in this subparagraph in that trust fund.
Page 56 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
(2) In addition to the required contributions in subsection (1) of this section, the state
shall contribute annually to the Teachers' Retirement System a percentage of the
total salaries of the state-funded and federally funded members it employs to pay
the cost of health insurance coverage for retirees who are not eligible for Medicare
and who retire on or after July 1, 2010, less the amounts that are otherwise required
to be paid by the retirees under KRS 161.675. The board shall deposit funds in the
medical insurance fund unless the board of trustees has established a trust fund
under 26 U.S.C. sec. 115 for this purpose. In this case, the board may deposit the
employer contribution in that trust fund. This contribution shall be known as the
state medical insurance fund stabilization contribution. The percentage to be
contributed by the state under this subsection:
(a) Shall be determined by the retirement system's actuary for each biennial
budget period;
(b) May be suspended or adjusted by the General Assembly if in its judgment the
welfare of the Commonwealth so demands; and
(c) Shall not exceed the lesser of the actual benefit cost for retirees not eligible
for Medicare who retire on or after July 1, 2010, or the amount contributed by
employers under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) All employers who employ nonuniversity members shall make a contribution for
each payroll on behalf of their active employees who participate in the Teachers'
Retirement System in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of payroll of those
active employees. The contribution specified by this subsection shall be used to
fund retiree health benefits.
(4) When the medical insurance fund established under KRS 161.420(5) achieves a
sufficient prefunded status as determined by the Teachers' Retirement System's
actuary, the board of trustees shall recommend to the General Assembly that the
contributions required under subsections (1)(c)2. and (e)3. and (3) of this section
Page 57 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 802
shall, in an actuarially accountable manner, be either decreased, suspended, or
eliminated. The decrease, suspension, or elimination in contributions required
under subsection (1)(c)2. of this section shall not exceed two and twenty-five
thousandths percent (2.025%) of annual compensation. The decrease, suspension,
or elimination in contributions required under subsection (1)(e)3. of this section
shall not exceed one and twenty-five hundredths percent (1.25%) of annual
compensation.
(5) Each employer shall remit the required employer contributions to the retirement
system under the terms and conditions specified for member contributions under
KRS 161.560. The state shall provide annual appropriations based upon estimated
funds needed to meet the requirements of KRS 161.155, 161.168, 161.507(4),
161.515, 161.545,[ 161.553,] 161.605, 161.612, and 161.620(1), (3), (5), (6), and
(7). In the event an annual appropriation is less than the amount of these
requirements, the state shall make up the deficit in the next biennium budget
appropriation to the retirement system. Employer contributions to the retirement
system are for the exclusive purpose of providing benefits to members and
annuitants and these contributions shall be considered deferred compensation to the
members. This subsection shall not apply to costs applicable to individuals who
become members on or after January 1, 2022.
Section 17. The following KRS section is repealed:
161.553 Funding of past statutory benefit improvements -- Schedules for appropriations
-- Cost-of-living increases.
Page 58 of 58
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed